Tennessee, session 114, SB2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-14-115, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) An association may submit the annual report required by subsection (a) in
electronic form.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2256
012132
- 1 -